Hawaii statutes.
§576B-203 Initiating
and responding tribunal of State. Under this chapter, a tribunal of this
State may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to a tribunal
of another state, and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in
another state or a foreign country. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next